Maryland, session 2025, HB1092.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1092*

HOUSE BILL 1092
9–1701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(q) (1) “Recycling” means any process in which recyclable materials are
collected, separated, or processed and returned to the marketplace in the form of raw
materials or products.
(2) (I) “RECYCLING” DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY OF THE FOLLOWING
CHEMICAL CONVERSION PROCESSES:
1. PYROLYSIS;
2. HYDROPYROLYSIS;
3. METHANOLYSIS;
4. GASIFICATION; OR
5. ENZYMATIC BREAKDOWN.
(II) “RECYCLING” DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY SIMILAR CHEMICAL
CONVERSION PROCESSES, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
9–1715.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT BUILD IN THE STATE A FACILITY THAT CONVERTS
PLASTIC TO FUEL OR FEEDSTOCK THROUGH:
(1) PYROLYSIS;
(2) HYDROPYROLYSIS;
(3) METHANOLYSIS;
(4) GASIFICATION;
(5) ENZYMATIC BREAKDOWN; OR
(6) A SIMILAR CHEMICAL CONVERSION PROCESS, AS DETERMINED BY
THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS

HOUSE BILL 1092 3
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.